Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-2151
Utilities district; bonds; when not required.

No bond for costs, appeal, supersedeas, injunction, or attachment shall be required of any metropolitan utilities district or of any officer, board, head of any department, agent, or employee of any such district in any proceeding or court action in which the metropolitan utilities district or any officer, board, head of department, agent, or employee is a party litigant in its, his, or her official capacity.

Laws 1965, c. 34, § 1, p. 225;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 14-1114;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 51.